Georgia, session 2025_26, HB847.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
An Act consolidating the offices of tax collector and tax receiver into the office of tax
commissioner of Cobb County, approved February 17, 1949 (Ga. L. 1949, p. 790), as
amended, is amended by revising Section 3 as follows:
"SECTION 3.
(a) The tax commissioner shall receive a minimum annual salary as provided by Code
Section 48-5-183 of the O.C.G.A. plus a supplement not to exceed the amount
of $47,443.00, to be paid in equal monthly installments from county funds. The tax
commissioner shall be allowed one chief clerk whose annual salary shall be paid in equal
H. B. 847
- 1 -

LC 47 3507
monthly installments from the funds of the county treasury. The annual salary for the chief
clerk shall be $170,751.00. Any candidate for the office of tax commissioner of Cobb
County shall, on the date of qualifying for such office in either a primary or a general
election, certify to the judge of the Probate Court of Cobb County the name of the person
the candidate shall appoint as chief clerk in the event he or she is elected to the office of
tax commissioner of Cobb County; and the person so named shall serve as the chief clerk
during the term for which he or she was so named. In the event of the death or removal
from office of said chief clerk, the tax commissioner of Cobb County shall have 30 days
from said date of death or removal from office of said chief clerk to certify to the judge of
the Probate Court of Cobb County the name of the chief clerk to be appointed.
(b) In addition to those employees provided for in subsection (a) of this section, there is
created the position of executive secretary to the tax commissioner. The executive
secretary shall be appointed by the tax commissioner, shall be under the tax commissioner's
direct supervision and control, and shall serve at the pleasure of the tax commissioner. The
tax commissioner shall establish such qualifications, education, and experience as he or she
deems necessary for the individual appointed to the position of executive secretary. The
salary of the executive secretary shall not exceed $71,111.00 per annum, to be paid in equal
monthly installments from the funds of Cobb County.
(c) In addition to those employees provided for in subsections (a) and (b) of this section,
there is created the position of administrative specialist in the office of the tax
commissioner. The administrative specialist shall be appointed by the tax commissioner,
shall be under the tax commissioner's direct supervision and control, and shall serve at the
pleasure of the tax commissioner. The tax commissioner shall establish such
qualifications, education, and experience as he or she deems necessary for the individual
appointed to the position of administrative specialist. The salary of the administrative
specialist shall not exceed $71,111.00 per annum, to be paid in equal monthly installments
from the funds of Cobb County.
H. B. 847
- 2 -

LC 47 3507
(d) The tax commissioner, chief clerk, executive secretary, and administrative specialist
shall be entitled to any other compensation or salary increase as provided for by law as well
as any cost-of-living increase or merit increase provided to county employees by the
governing authority of Cobb County."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 847
- 3 -